Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429.06
Electronic nicotine delivery system; e-liquid container; requirements.

(1) A person holding a license under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 shall ensure that any e-liquid container for an electronic nicotine delivery system sold by such person:

(a) Meets any applicable packaging standards imposed by the federal Child Nicotine Poisoning Prevention Act of 2015, 15 U.S.C. 1472a; and

(b) Has a label that meets the nicotine addictiveness warning statement requirements set forth in 21 C.F.R. 1143.3.

(2) For purposes of this section, e-liquid container means a container holding any consumable material as defined in section 77-4003.01.

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 17.